public/libs/speakjs/dictsource/da_rules
// This file is UTF8 encoded
// Spelling-to-phoneme rules for Danish

// Rules and comments marked //PB
// have been made by Peter Bjarkov pbj1234@hotmail.com

// Phonemes - vowels: i e E y Y & &# @ @- a 3 W W# V A 0 (zero) o O u

.replace
ü	y
ö ø
ä æ
// velars - testing "j"
.L01  k g ck nk ng q j
// labialer
.L02 p b f v m
// fortungekonsonanter experimental
.L03 l d
// PB fortungevokaler - front vowels
.L04 u y i ø o
// PB bagtungevokaler - not finished, not used yet
.L05 a æ å
// pande, bande - pege, bege - passe, basse
.L06 p b
.L07 t k v // time, kime - tone, kone - tage, bage - tanke, banke TESTING "v"
.L08 sp st sk
.L09 m n // ens før vokal: naller, maller - ikke efter: nam, nan
.L10 c k
.L11 a e

.group a

        a          &         // PB changed from [a?]
        au (_revoir %o       // PB au revoir
        au (_pair  %o        // PB au pair-pige
        a (lt      &         // PB alt, overalt
    vr) a (lt      A         // PB vralte

// PB general rule: [A] after r
     r) a (_       A         // PB jura, zebra
    fr) a          A         // PB bagfra
  laur) a          A         // PB name
     r) a (en      A         // PB rivieraen
    Cr) a (n       A         // PB transport
     r) a (n       A         // PB ran, ransage
    tr) a (C       A         // PB straf, traf, trav
   str) a          A         // PB ekstra
     r) a (L06     A         // PB trappe
     r) a (CL04    A         // PB generation
  vibr) a (to      'A        // PB stressed
     r) afae       Af&'e     // PB Rafael
     r) a (ting    Ej        // PB
     r) a (t       a         // PB ratgear
     r) a (d       A         // PB rad, radmager
     r) adar       AdAr      // PB
     r) a (s       a         // PB rasende, brase
     r) a (v       a         // PB fraværende, rav, rasende, ravage
  L01r) a          A         // PB grad, gral
     r) a (l       A         // PB cerebral, bralre, general, ralle
 kamer) a          A         // PB
 _hurr) a          'A        // PB stressed
        a (dvar    &         // PB terroradvarsel
        a (nst     &         // PB overanstrengt
        a (nvend   &         // PB bruseranvendelse
 _madr) a (s       'A        // PB stressed
    cr) a (ck      &         // PB
 efter) a (b       &         // PB efterabe
   for) a (n       &         // foran
   for) a (nd      A         // PB forandre
   for) a (nk      A         // PB forankre
     r) a (nch     &         // PB
   _br) a (nch     A         // PB
    br) an (che    aN        // PB
     r) a (nsigt   &         // PB pokeransigt

// PB general rule: [a] after r followed by sp/st/sk
     r) a (L08     a         // PB rask

// PB general rule: [&:] after m/n before L02 followed by e
   L09) a (L02e    &:        // mave
    gn) av (pot    Aw        // PB gnavpotte
  torn) ad (o      '&d       // PB stressed
     n) a (p       A         // PB
     n) a (palm    &         // PB

// PB General rule a between L02: [A]
   L02) a (L02     A         // PB mappe - too broad?
   L02) a (L02e    &         // PB hvabehar - too broad?
     f) a (L02rL04 &         // PB fabrik
   L02) a (L02le   &         // PB vable
   L02) a (L02ser  A         // PB babser
     m) ameluk     Am3l'u    // PB
     p) apegøje    ap@g'Vj3  // PB
     p) a (v+      &         // PB pave, pavillon

    sn) a (vs      A         // PB
   L09) a (j       a         // PB maj
     m) a (jo+     &         // PB major, majonæse

// PB general rule: [a] after l before n
     l) a (n       &         // land
     l) an (ce     AN        // PB lancere
    pl) an (ch     AN        // PB planche

// PB general rule: [a] after consonant before m
     C) a (m       a         // PB ham, gamle, lam, Sam
     s) a (mant    &         // PB Samantha
        a (ms      a         // PN Amsterdam
   pyj) a (ma      '&        // PB pyjamas
     c) amaro      &m'Ero    // PB Camaro (car)
   lig) a          &         // PB ligamester

// PB general rule: [&] after l before m + vowel
     l) a (mA      &         // PB lama
 _rekl) a (me      '&        // PB stressed

// PB general rule: consonant + a + labial + front vowel
     C) a (mL04+   &         // PB vitamin, dynamit, kamin
  gest) a (po      'a        // PB
   kad) a (ver     '&        // PB stressed
     r) a (L02L04+ A         // PB bravo
     f) a (vo+     a         // PB favorit
 willi) a (m       a         // PB name
  alab) a (m       '&        // PB Alabama
        a (mf      A         // PB amfetamin, amfora

// PB general rule: [&] after f before m/n
     f) a (L09     &         // PB familie, fane
     f) a (mle     A         // PB

//   fan) a (tL04      '&        // PB fanatiker, fanatisk

// PB general rule: [&] after k
     k) a (+       &         // PB kage, kaste
 _chik) a (ne      '&        // PB stressed
    sk) a (k       A         // PB skak
     k) abaret     abar'E    // PB
    _b) are (t     ar'&#     // PB stressed
  _mak) a (b       '&        // PB makaber - stressed

// general rule: [&:] after consonant before "ne"
     C) a (ne      &:        // PB "mane" opposed to "mande"
     r) a (ne      A         // PB krigsveteraner

// PB general rule: [a] after k before p
   L10) a (p+      a         // PB kappe, kaptajn, handicap
   L10) a (pL04+   &         // PB kapitel
   dac) a (po      '&        // PB stressed
     k) a (pL11+   &         // PB [&] before a/e - kapacitet, kapere
     k) a (pre     &         // PB
     k) a (pring   &         // PB

// PB general rule: [a] after sk before f
    sk) a (f+      a         // PB skaffe

// PB general rule: [&] after sk before p/b
    sk) a (L06+    &         // PB skab, beredskab

// PB general rule: [A] after L01+ p/b + t
   L01) a (L06t+   A         // PB skabt, gabt

// PB general rule: [a] after k	 before m
     k) a (m       a         // PB kam, kamp
     c) a (mp      &         // PB camping

// PB amm => [a]
        a (mm      a         // PB kammerat, amme
// PB kame => [&]
   L10) a (me      &         // PB kamel, kamera, Camelot

// PB general rule: [&] after d
     d) a (mL11    &         // PB dame, damask
 _endd) a (_       '&        // PB
  _med) a (lje     '&        // PB stressed
underd) a (nig     '&        // PB stressed
        a (fbryd   A         // PB nødafbryder
        a (fvi     A         // PB afvise
    ad) a (m       A         // PB name
     d) a (g@+     a         // PB dagbog, daggry
//     d) ag (-+     aw        // PB dag-job
     d) a (gs@     a         // PB dagsorden, dagsaktuel, dagslys
gammeld) a (gs     &         // PB
     d) agger (t   AgV       // PB
  mand) ag (s      &         // PB mandagsmiddag
 tirsd) ag (s      &         // PB tirsdagsmiddag
  onsd) ag (s      &         // PB onsdagsmiddag
 torsd) ag (s      &         // PB torsdagsmiddag
  fred) ag (s      &         // PB fredagsmiddag
  lørd) ag (s      &         // PB lørdagsmiddag
  sønd) ag (s      &         // PB søndagsmiddag
 hverd) ag         &         // PB hverdagskost
    dd) a (g+      &         // PB middagstid
    _d) a (m_      a         // PB dam
    _d) a (mm      a         // PB dammen
     d) a (fn      a         // PB dafnie

// PB general rule: [A] after d before mp
     d) a (mp      A         // PB damp

// PB general rule: [A] after a followed by k/g plus t
        a (L01t+   A         // PB ak, aktionær, aktuar

// PB general rule: [A] after k before g (au)
     k) a (g       A         // PB kagle

// PB general rule: [a] after j before g
     k) a (j       a         // PB kaj
     k) a (ja      &         // PB kajak
// PB general rule: [A] after k before p
     k) a (ps      a         // PB kapsel

// PB general rule: [Au] after m/n before g (au)
   L09) ag         Au        // PB nagle
     m) agne (t    Aun'e     // PB magnet
     m) ag (i      &g        // PB magi
   arm) agna (c    &N'A      // PB
     m) ag (asi    ag        // PB magasin
   syn) ag (oge    &g        // PB
     m) ag (azi    &g        // PB magazine
        aggie      &gi       // PB Maggie
  flan) ag (an     &g        // PB Flanagan

// PB general rule: [ak] after m/n before gt
   L09) ag (t      ak        // PB løgnagtig

// PB general rule: [A] before vl (au)
        a (vl      A         // PB avle

// PB general rule: [A] before kt
        a (kt      A         // PB aktuar, aktivitet

// PB general rule: [A] before cc
        a (cc      A         // accent
     b) accarat    akar'a    // PB
    st) a (ccato   &         // PB

// PB general rule: [Au] after b before v
     b) av (++     Au        // PB forbavset
     b) a (vian+   &         // PB exception

// PB general rule: [a] after sp/st/sk before m
   L08) a (m       a         // skam
     _) a (mb      A         // PB ambition
        a (mt      A         // PB amtskommune
  test) a (m       &         // PB testamente

// PB general rule: [A] after sp/st/sk before v
   L08) a (v       &         // stav

// PB general rule: af = [Au] before s
        af (s      Au        // afstand

// PB general rule: [Au] before l
        av (l      Au        // savle, tavle

// PB general rule: [Au] after l
    _l) av         Au        // lavenergi, lavteknologi, lavadel
     l) a (vendel  &         // exception: lavendel
    sl) a (v       &:        // exception: slaver
     l) av (et     &:v       // exception: lave
    _l) av (_      &v        // PB lav
     l) av (er     &v        // PB laver, lavere
     l) av (ed     &v        // PB lavede
     l) av (es     &v        // PB laves
     l) av (t      &v        // PB lavt
     l) av (ni     &v        // PB madlavning
     l) av (a_     &v        // PB lava
     l) av (ae     &v        // PB lavaen
     l) av (aC     &v        // PB lavalampe
     l) av (ine    &v        // PB lavine
     b) alaklav (a &l&kl'&:v // PB
     g) av (mi     Au        // PB gavmild

// PB general rule: [Au] after t before s
     t) av (s      Au        // tavshed

// PB general rule: [A] before r
        a (r+      A         // skar
     e) a (rL04+   &         // PB stearin
   saf) a (ri      'A        // PB stressed
  _has) a (rd      'A        // PB stressed
  _mal) a (ria     'A        // PB stressed
   _al) a (rm      'A        // PB stressed
  _mon) a (rk      'A        // PB stressed
  _mon) a (rki     A'        // PB stressed

// PB general rule: [a] before velars
        a (L01++   a         // planke, slanke, anke, flanke, gang
    _m) ag (_      &j        // PB
 _mass) a (kre     'a        // PB stressed
     _) a (L01L04++ &        // angive, ankomme
  selv) a (ngiv    &         // PB selvangivelse
     p) a (gn+     &         // PB kompagniskab
     p) a (gL11+   &         // PB propaganda
     @) a (krL04+  &         // PB anakronisme TEST
     r) a (L01++   A         // PB tragisk
        a (kadem++ &         // PB militærakademi
   spr) ag (let    Aw        // PB
        a (L01e++  a         // bange
    re) a (g+      &         // PB reagere, reagensglas
        a (ka++    &         // PB akavet, akademiker, akacie
     f) a (nklub+  &         // PB
        a (nho++   &         // PB anholde
        a (ngav++  &         // PB angav
        a (ngå++   &         // PB
     b) a (gage++  &         // PB bagage
     s) a (g+      &         // PB ankesag, sag, sago, heksagon
    sl) a (ng+     &         // PB
    sl) a (nge+    a         // PB
 livsl) a (ng+     a         // PB livslang
  skav) a (nk      'A        // PB
        a (nklag++ &         // PB anklage
        ang (re    aN        // PB angre
     _) ang (eC    aN        // PB anger,  angelsaksisk
     _) ang (ol    ang       // PB Angola
        ang (reb   &ng       // PB angreb
        ang (ri+   &ng       // angribe
        a (gt      A         // agt
     l) a (gt+     A         // PB lagt - avoid [au]
  forl) a (gt_     ''A       // PB stressed

// PB general rule: [A] before vn after consonant
     C) a (vn      A         // favn, savn
    gn) a (vne     &         // PB

// PB general rule: [a] after kl before consonant
    kl) a (L06     a         // PB klap
